Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
B. Filing Documents

§ 17-19-120.
Filing requirements.

A document shall satisfy the requirements of this section, and of any other section that adds to or varies these requirements, to be entitled to filing by the secretary of state.

This act shall require or permit filing the document in the office of the secretary of state.

The document shall contain the information required by this act. It may contain other information as well.

The document shall be typewritten or printed.

The document shall be in the English language. However, a corporate name need not be in English if written in English letters or Arabic or Roman numerals, and the certificate of existence required of foreign corporations need not be in English if accompanied by an English translation acceptable to the secretary of state.

The document shall be executed:

By the chairman of the board of directors of a domestic or foreign corporation, by its president or by another of its officers;

If directors have not been selected or the corporation has not been formed, by an incorporator; or

If the corporation is in the hands of a receiver, trustee or other court-appointed fiduciary, by that fiduciary.

The person executing a document shall sign it manually and shall state beneath or opposite the signature his name and the capacity in which he signs. The document may, but need not, contain:

The corporate seal;

An attestation by the secretary or an assistant secretary; or

An acknowledgment, verification or proof.

If the secretary of state has prescribed a mandatory form for a document under W.S.

17-19-121

, the document shall be in or on the prescribed form.

The document shall be delivered to the office of the secretary of state for filing and shall be accompanied by:

One (1) exact or conformed copy (except as provided in W.S.

17-28-103

);

The correct filing fee; and

Any past due or currently due franchise tax, license fee, other fee or penalty required by this act or other law.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1; 2008, ch. 90, § 2; 2014 ch. 81, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2008 amendment,

Laws 2008, ch. 90, § 2, effective January 1, 2009, in (j)(i) substituted “17-28-103” for “17-19-503 and

17-19-1509

.”

The 2014 amendment,

in (j)(iii), inserted “part due or currently due” and “other fee.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsections (b) and (j)(iii) and in the first sentence in subsection (c), see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxviii).

§ 17-19-121.
Forms.

If the secretary of state so requires, use of forms provided by the secretary of state pursuant to this subsection is mandatory. The secretary of state may prescribe and furnish on request forms for:

An application for a certificate of existence;

A foreign corporation’s application for a certificate of authority to transact business in this state;

A foreign corporation’s application for a certificate of withdrawal;

The annual report;

A foreign corporation’s application for a certificate of continuance; and

A foreign corporation’s application for certificate of domestication.

The secretary of state may prescribe and furnish on request forms for other documents required or permitted to be filed by this act but their use is not mandatory.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (b), see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxviii).

§ 17-19-122.
Filing, service and copying fees.

The secretary of state shall collect the following fees when the documents described in this subsection are delivered for filing:

Document Fee (i) Articles of incorporation $50.00 (ii) and (iii) Repealed by Laws 2014, ch. 65, §
2. (iv) Amendment of articles of incorporation $25.00 (v) Application for certificate of authority $50.00 (vi) Application for certificate of existence or authorization $20.00 (vii) Application for conversion $75.00

Click to view

The secretary of state shall collect a fee of five dollars ($5.00) upon being served with process under this act.

The secretary of state shall set and collect comparable filing, service and copying fees for those documents not listed in subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1; 2000, ch. 35, § 1; 2014 ch. 65, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2021 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, repealed former (a)(ii) and (iii) which read “Corporation's statement of change of registered agent or registered office or both
. . . . .
$3.00” and “Agent's statement of change of registered office for each affected corporation
. . . . .
$3.00.”; in the form, in (a)(v), substituted “$25.00” for “$10.00,” and added (a)(vii).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted "$50.00" for "$25.00" in (a)(i); "$25.00" for "$3.00" in (a)(iv); "$50.00" for "$25.00" in (a)(v); and "$20.00" for "$3.00" in (a)(vi).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (b), see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxviii).

§ 17-19-123.
Effective date of document.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a document is effective:

At the time of filing on the date it is filed, as evidenced by the secretary of state’s endorsement on the original document; or

At the time specified in the document as its effective time on the date it is filed.

A document may specify a delayed effective time and date, and if it does so the document becomes effective at the time and date specified. If a delayed effective date but no time is specified, the document is effective at the close of business on that date. A delayed effective date for a document may not be later than the 90th day after the date filed.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-124.
Correcting filed document.

A domestic or foreign corporation may correct a document filed by the secretary of state if the document:

Contains an incorrect statement; or

Was defectively executed, attested, sealed, verified or acknowledged.

A document is corrected:

By preparing articles of correction that:

Describe the document, including its filing date, or attach a copy of the document to the articles of correction;

Specify the incorrect statement and the reason it is incorrect or the manner in which the execution was defective; and

Correct the incorrect statement or defective execution.

By delivering the articles of correction to the secretary of state for filing.

Articles of correction are effective on the effective date of the document they correct except as to persons relying on the uncorrected document and adversely affected by the correction. As to those persons, articles of correction are effective when filed.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-125.
Filing duty of secretary of state.

If a document delivered to the office of the secretary of state for filing satisfies the requirements of W.S.

17-19-120

, the secretary of state shall file it.

The secretary of state files a document by stamping or otherwise endorsing “Filed,” together with his name and official title and the date and the time of filing, on both the original and copy of the document and on the receipt for the filing fee. After filing a document, except as provided in W.S.

17-28-103

, the secretary of state shall deliver the document copy, with the filing fee receipt (or acknowledgment of receipt if no fee is required) attached, to the domestic or foreign corporation or its representative. The secretary of state, in his discretion, may issue a certificate evidencing the filing of a document upon the payment of the requisite fee.

If the secretary of state refuses to file a document he shall return it to the domestic or foreign corporation or its representative within fifteen (15) days after the document was delivered, together with a brief, written explanation of the reason or reasons for his refusal.

The secretary of state’s duty to file documents under this section is ministerial. Filing or refusal to file a document does not:

Affect the validity or invalidity of the document in whole or in part;

Relate to the correctness or incorrectness of information contained in the document; or

Create a presumption that the document is valid or invalid or that information contained in the document is correct or incorrect.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1; 2008, ch. 90, § 2; 2021 ch. 21, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted "fifteen (15)" for "five (5)" in (c).

Amendment effective January 1, 2009. —

Laws 2008, ch. 90, § 2, amends this section effective January 1, 2009, by substituting “17-28-103” for “17-19-503 and

17-19-1510

” in (b).

§ 17-19-126.
Appeal from secretary of state's refusal to file document.

If the secretary of state refuses to file a document delivered to his office for filing, the domestic or foreign corporation may, within thirty (30) days after the return of the document, appeal the refusal to the district court of the county where the corporation’s principal office is located in the state or, if the corporation does not have a principal office in the state, the district court of the county where its registered office is or will be located, or the district court of the county of residence of an incorporator for a domestic corporation, or in the district court of Laramie county. The appeal is commenced by petitioning the court to compel filing the document and by attaching to the petition the document and the secretary of state’s explanation of his refusal to file.

The court may summarily order the secretary of state to file the document or take other action the court considers appropriate.

The court’s final decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-127.
Evidentiary effect of copy of filed document.

A certificate attached to a copy of a document filed by the secretary of state, bearing his signature (which may be in facsimile) and the seal of this state, is conclusive evidence that the original document is on file with the secretary of state.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-128.
Certificate of existence.

Any person may apply to the secretary of state to furnish a certificate of existence for a domestic or foreign corporation.

The certificate of existence sets forth:

The domestic corporation’s corporate name or the foreign corporation’s corporate name used in this state;

That:

The domestic corporation is duly incorporated under the law of this state, the date of its incorporation, and the period of its duration if less than perpetual; or

The foreign corporation is authorized to transact business in this state.

That all fees, taxes and penalties owed to this state have been paid, if:

Payment is reflected in the records of the secretary of state; and

Nonpayment affects the good standing of the domestic or foreign corporation.

That its most recent annual report required by W.S.

17-19-1630

has been delivered to the secretary of state;

That articles of dissolution have not been filed; and

Other facts of record in the office of the secretary of state that may be requested by the applicant.

Subject to any qualification stated in the certificate, a certificate of existence issued by the secretary of state may be relied upon as conclusive evidence that the domestic or foreign corporation is in existence or is authorized to transact business in this state.

The term “certificate of existence” is synonymous with the term “certificate of good standing.”

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-129.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1; repealed by 2014 ch. 65, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1, related to penalty for signing false document.